Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5216.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 23-25-37 and 23-25-38 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-25
entitled "Pesticide Control" are hereby amended to read as follows:
23-25-37. Pesticide applications and notification of pesticide applications at schools
Pesticide and rodenticide applications and notification of pesticide and rodenticide
applications at schools.
(a) The department of environmental management and the department of health shall
develop regulations as follows: (1) to restrict the use of hazardous pesticides and rodenticides in
schools, pre-schools and child care centers in Rhode Island including a prohibition on the use of
any pesticide or rodenticide containing the herbicide glyphosate; (2) for the promotion and
implementation of integrated pest management (IPM) as defined in § 23-25.2-2; (3) to cover
situations where an emergency application of pesticide or rodenticide must be conducted to
eliminate an immediate threat to human health, and establish reporting requirements for these
emergency applications. The regulations developed pursuant to the provisions of this section shall
be adopted and implemented no later than January 1, 2026.
(b)(1) On and after July 1, 2001, no person other than a licensed or certified commercial
applicator as defined in § 23-25-4, shall apply pesticide or rodenticide within any building or on
the grounds of any school. This section shall not apply in the case of an emergency application of
pesticide or rodenticide to eliminate an immediate threat to human health, where it is impractical
to obtain the services of any such applicator; provided the emergency application does not involve

a restricted use or state limited use pesticide or rodenticide. For purposes of this section,
“emergency” means a sudden need to mitigate or eliminate a pest which threatens the health or
safety of a student or staff member. Provided, further, effective January 1, 2026, this section shall
not apply to any regional vocational agriculture center.
(2) On or after July 1, 2026, no person shall apply a lawn care pesticide or rodenticide on
the grounds of any public or private preschool or public or private school including, but not limited
to, any day care, charter school or vocational school with students in grade twelve (12) or lower;
provided, however, that:
(i) An application of a lawn care pesticide or rodenticide may be made at a public or private
school as provided in subsection (b)(2) of this section with students grade twelve (12) or lower on
the playing fields and playgrounds of such school pursuant to an integrated pest management plan,
which plan:
(A) Shall be consistent with the model pest control management plan developed by the
department of environmental management and the department of health; and
(B) May be developed by a local district or regional school board (hereinafter "school
board") with approval from the department of environmental management and department of
health;
(ii) An emergency application of a lawn care pesticide or rodenticide may be made to
eliminate a threat to human health as defined in subsection (b)(1) of this section.
(c)(1) On and after July 1, 2002, at the beginning of each school year, each local school
authority and private school administration shall provide the staff of each school and the parents or
guardians of each child enrolled in each school with a written statement of the committee’s school
board's policy on pesticide or rodenticide application on school property and a description of any
pesticide or rodenticide applications made at the school during the previous school year.
(2) The statement and description shall be provided to the parents or guardians of any child
who transfers to a school during the school year. The statement shall: (i) indicate that the staff,
parents, or guardians may register for prior notice of pesticide or rodenticide applications at the
school; and (ii) describe the emergency notification procedures provided for in this section. Notice
of any modification to the pesticide or rodenticide application policy shall be sent to any person
who registers for notice under this section.
(3) Effective on and after July 1, 2026, local school administrators shall, at the beginning
of each school year, make available as part of the requirements of this section, an integrated pest
management plan to parents, teachers and school staff with a copy to the department of education.
(d) On and after July 1, 2002, parents or guardians of children in any school and school
LC000778 - Page 2 of 7

staff may register for prior notice of pesticide or rodenticide application at their school. Each school
shall maintain a registry of persons requesting the notice. Prior to providing for any application of
pesticide or rodenticide within any building or on the grounds of any school, the local school
authority administration shall provide for the distribution of notice to parents and guardians who
have registered for prior notice under this section, such that the notice is received no later than
twenty-four (24) hours prior to the application. Notice shall be given by any means practicable to
school staff who have registered for the notice. Notice under this subsection shall include: (1) the
common or trade name and the name of the active ingredient; (2) the EPA registration number as
listed on the pesticide or rodenticide label; (3) the target pest; (4) the exact location of the
application on the school property; (5) the date of the application; and (6) the name of the school
administrator, or a designee, who may be contacted for further information; and (7) the above
information shall be sent to the department of education.
(e) On and after July 1, 2003, no application of pesticide or rodenticide may be made in
any building or on the grounds of any school during regular school hours or during planned
activities at any school. No child shall enter an area where the application has been made until it is
safe to do so according to the provisions on the pesticide or rodenticide label. This section shall not
apply to the use of germicides, disinfectants, sanitizers, deodorizers, antimicrobal agents,
insecticidal gels, non-volatile insect or rodent bait in a tamper resistant container, insect repellants
or the application of a pesticide or rodenticide classified by the United States Environmental
Protection Agency as an exempt material under 40 CFR 152.25.
(f) On and after July 1, 2002, a the local school authority administration may make an
emergency application of pesticide or rodenticide without prior notice under this section in the
event of an immediate threat to human health, provided the board administration provides for
notice, by any means practicable, on or before the day that the application is to take place, to any
person who has requested prior notice under this section.
(g) On and after July 1, 2002, notice of any pesticide or rodenticide application at a school
shall be given, by any means practicable, to the parents or guardians of any child enrolled at the
school and to the staff of the school not later than one week after the application. The notice shall
include: (1) the common or trade name and the name of the active ingredient; (2) the EPA
registration number as listed on the pesticide or rodenticide label; (3) the target pest; (4) the exact
location of the application on the school property; (5) the date of the application; and (6) the name
of the school administrator, or a designee, who may be contacted for further information. A copy
of the record of each pesticide or rodenticide application at a school shall be maintained at the
school for a period of five (5) years.
LC000778 - Page 3 of 7

(h) Not later than July 1, 2002, the department of environmental management and the
department of health shall jointly establish a task force which shall specifically address methods to
promote public education and professional training about pesticides and rodenticides, their
potential health effects and IPM least toxic alternatives, and for evaluation and analysis of current
pest control practices at school and child care facilities. The task force shall complete a report on
its findings no later than December 31, 2026 and shall submit a report to the governor, speaker of
the house and president of the senate detailing those findings.
(i) Storage of pesticide and rodenticide containers prior to disposal. Effective July 1, 2026,
all unused or unwanted pesticides or rodenticides being stored prior to disposal, whether in sealed
or previously opened containers, and all pesticide or rodenticide containers that have not been or
cannot be rinsed shall be:
(1) Kept in a secure enclosure; and
(2) Maintained so as to prevent:
(i) Deterioration of containers;
(ii) Unauthorized use;
(iii) Mishandling;
(iv) Loss;
(v) Contamination of the environment; and
(vi) Risk to the public health.
(j) Commencing January 1, 2027, the department of education shall provide to each school
district, school board of each school district, superintendent of each school district, and any day
care center under the supervision of the department of education with an explanation and the
requirements of the pesticide or rodenticide application and notification law.
(k) On or after January 1, 2026, every school that has pesticide or rodenticide applications
shall submit to the department of education a pesticide or rodenticide application report that shall
include the following:
(1) A description of the pesticide or rodenticide applied to the grounds and the dates and
times of the application;
(2) The name and title of the person applying the pesticides or rodenticides and whether
the person is in compliance with subsection (b) of this section requiring a licensed or certified
applicator to apply the pesticides or rodenticides;
(3) Any emergency applications of pesticides or rodenticides during the previous year; and
(4) Copies of any notice to parents issued pursuant to this section regarding pesticide or
rodenticide application.
LC000778 - Page 4 of 7

23-25-38. Pesticide applications and notification of pesticide applications at pre-
schools and child care centers Pesticide and rodenticide applications and notification of
pesticide and rodenticide applications at pre-schools and child care centers.
(a)(1) On and after July 1, 2003, no application of pesticide or rodenticide may be made by
any person other than a certified or licensed commercial applicator as defined in § 23-25-4 in any
building or on the grounds of any pre-school, child day care center, group/family day care home or
family day care home, during regular business hours. No child enrolled at such center or home may
enter an area where pesticides or rodenticides have been applied until it is safe to do so according
to the provisions on the pesticide or rodenticide label. For purposes of this section, emergency shall
mean a sudden need to mitigate or eliminate a pest which threatens the health or safety of a student
or staff member. This section shall not apply to the use of germicides, disinfectants, sanitizers,
deodorizers, antimicrobal agents, insecticidal gels, non-volatile insect or rodent bait in a tamper
resistant container, insect repellants, insecticidal disks, or the application of a pesticide or
rodenticide classified by the United States Environmental Protection Agency as an exempt material
under 40 CFR part 152.25.
(2) On and after July 1, 2026, no person shall apply a lawn care pesticide or rodenticide on
the grounds of any pre-school or child day care center; provided, however, that;
(i) An application of a lawn care pesticide or rodenticide may be made at a pre-school or
child day care center on the playing fields or playgrounds of such school pursuant to an integrated
pest management plan, which plan shall be consistent with the model pest control management plan
developed by the department of environmental management and the department of health; and
(ii) An emergency application of a lawn care pesticide or rodenticide may be made to
eliminate a threat to human health as defined in § 23-25-37.
(b) On and after July 1, 2002, notice of any pesticide or rodenticide application at any such
center or home shall be given, by any means practicable, to the parents or guardians of any child
enrolled at the center or home not later than twenty-four (24) hours before the application. The
notice shall include: (1) the common or trade name and the name of the active ingredient; (2) the
EPA registration number as listed on the pesticide or rodenticide label; (3) the target pest; (4) the
exact location of the application on the property; (5) the date of the application; and (6) the name
of the pre-school or child care center owner/operator or their designee.
(c) The department of health shall provide any public or private pre-school and child day
care center with an explanation and the requirements of the pesticide or rodenticide application and
notification law.
(d) On or after July 1, 2026, every pre-school and child day care center that has pesticide
LC000778 - Page 5 of 7

and rodenticide applications shall submit to the department of education a copy of the notices that
were sent to parents and guardians.
SECTION 2. Chapter 16-21 of the General Laws entitled "Health and Safety of Pupils" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-21-43. PFAS in artificial athletic fields - Task force.
Not later than July 1, 2026, the department of environmental management and the
department of health shall jointly establish a task force which shall specifically investigate, identify
and address the presence of and potential health risk associated with the presence of poly-
fluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) in artificial fields at private and public schools in Rhode Island. The
task force shall report its findings no later than January 1, 2028, to the governor, speaker of the
house and president of the senate.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000778
========
LC000778 - Page 6 of 7